Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Water, Sewer, Garbage Disposal, and Fire Protection Districts

§ 19-5-151.
Incorporation of districts authorized.

Any contiguous area situated within any county of the state, and not being situated within the corporate boundaries of any existing municipality, and having no adequate water system, sewer system, garbage and waste collection and disposal system, or fire protection facilities serving such area, may become incorporated as a water district, as a sewer district, as a garbage and waste collection and disposal district, as a fire protection district, as a combined water and sewer district, as a combined water and garbage and waste collection and disposal district, as a combined water and fire protection district, or as a combined water, sewer, garbage and waste collection and disposal and fire protection district, in the manner set forth in the following sections.

If the certificated area of a nonprofit, nonshare corporation chartered under the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act for the purpose of owning and operating rural waterworks lies in one county, the corporation may become incorporated as a water district in the manner set forth in Section 19-5-153(3). If the nonprofit, nonshare corporation’s certificated area lies in more than one (1) county, the procedure in Section 19-5-164 shall be used.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-21; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 304, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 306, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 17, 2008.).

§ 19-5-153.
Petition for incorporation; adoption of resolution of intent to incorporate.

A petition for the incorporation of a district may be submitted to the board of supervisors of a county, signed by not less than twenty-five (25) owners of real property residing within the boundaries of the proposed district. The petition shall include: (a) a statement of the necessity for the service or services to be supplied by the proposed district; (b) the proposed corporate name for the district; (c) the proposed boundaries of the district; (d) an estimate of the cost of the acquisition or construction of any facilities to be operated by the district, which estimate, however, shall not serve as a limitation upon the financing of improvements or extensions to the facilities; (e) a statement of whether or not the board of supervisors of the county shall exercise the authority to levy the tax outlined in Section 19-5-189, Mississippi Code of 1972; and (f) a statement of whether or not the board of supervisors of the county shall exercise the authority to make assessments as outlined in Section 19-5-191, Mississippi Code of 1972. The petition shall be signed in person by the petitioners, with their respective residence addresses. The petition shall be accompanied by a sworn statement of the person or persons circulating the petition, who shall state under oath that the person or persons witnessed the signature of each petitioner, that each signature is the signature of the person it purports to be, and that, to the best of the person’s or persons’ knowledge, each petitioner was at the time of signing an owner of real property within and a resident of the proposed district. No individual tract of land containing one hundred sixty (160) acres or more shall be included in any such district unless the owner or owners of said tract is a signer under oath of the petition for the incorporation of such district.

The board of supervisors of a county, in its discretion, may initiate the incorporation of a district under Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 by resolution of the board and presentation of a petition signed by at least twenty-five (25) property owners of the area to be incorporated if at least forty (40) property owners reside within the district. However, no individual tract of land containing one hundred sixty (160) acres or more shall be included in any such district unless the owner or owners of the tract gives written consent for the inclusion of the lands in such district.

The board of directors of a nonprofit, nonshare rural waterworks corporation may petition the board of supervisors of a county in which the corporation’s certificated area lies to become a water district under Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207. The board of directors shall adopt a resolution at a special meeting of the board. The meeting shall be open to any subscriber provided water service by the corporation. The board shall mail a notice of the meeting to each subscriber provided water service. The resolution shall provide that information required of the petition under subsection (1) of this section. The resolution shall be adopted by a three-fifths (3/5) majority vote of the board of directors.

With respect to the incorporation and operation of a fire protection district pursuant to Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207, the word “owners” shall include any lessees of real property of a water supply district the term of whose original lease is not less than sixty (60) years and shall also include sublessees if the original lease of which they are subletting is not less than sixty (60) years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-21; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 419; Laws, 1999, ch. 304, § 2, eff from and after August 2, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).

§ 19-5-155.
Public hearing; resolution of intention.

Upon the filing of such petition, or upon the adoption of a resolution declaring the intent of the board of supervisors to incorporate such district, it shall then be the duty of the board of supervisors of such county to fix a time and place for a public hearing upon the question of the public convenience and necessity of the incorporation of the proposed district. The date fixed for such hearing shall be not more than thirty (30) days after the filing of the petition, and the date of the hearing, the place at which it shall be held, the proposed boundaries of said district, and the purpose of the hearing, shall be set forth in a notice to be signed by the clerk of the board of supervisors of such county. Such notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation within such proposed district once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks prior to the date of such hearing. The first such publication shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date of such hearing and the last such publication shall be made not more than fourteen (14) days prior to the date of such hearing.

If, at such public hearing, the board of supervisors finds (1) that the public convenience and necessity require the creation of the district, and (2) that the creation of the district is economically sound and desirable, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution making the aforesaid findings and declaring its intention to create the district on a date to be specified in such resolution. Such resolution shall also designate the name of the proposed district, define its territorial limits which shall be fixed by said board pursuant to such hearing, and state whether or not the board of supervisors shall levy the tax authorized in section 19-5-189, Mississippi Code of 1972, and whether or not the board of supervisors proposes to assess benefited properties as outlined in section 19-5-191, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-21; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1973).

§ 19-5-157.
Publication of resolution; election.

A certified copy of the resolution so adopted shall be published in a newspaper having a general circulation within such proposed district once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks prior to the date specified in such resolution as the date upon which such board intends to create such district. The first such publication shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date specified, and the last such publication shall be made not more than fourteen (14) days prior to such date.

If twenty percent (20%) or one hundred fifty (150), whichever is the lesser, of the qualified electors of such proposed district file written petition with such board of supervisors on or before the date specified aforesaid, protesting against the creation of such district, the board of supervisors shall call an election on the question of the creation of such district. Such election shall be held and conducted by the election commissioners of the county as nearly as may be in accordance with the general laws governing elections, and such election commissioners shall determine which of the qualified electors of such county reside within the proposed district, and only such qualified electors as reside within such proposed district shall be entitled to vote in such election. Notice of such election setting forth the time, place or places, and purpose of such election shall be published by the clerk of the board of supervisors, and such notice shall be published for the time and the manner provided in section 19-5-155 for the publication of the resolution of intention. The ballots to be prepared for and used at said election shall be in substantially the following form:

“FOR CREATION OF DISTRICT ( ) AGAINST CREATION OF DISTRICT ( )” and voters shall vote by placing a cross mark (x) or check mark (

Π

) opposite their choice.

Click to view

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-21; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1973).

§ 19-5-159.
Resolution of creation.

If no petition requiring an election be filed or if three-fifths (3/5) of those voting in said election provided in Section 19-5-157 vote in favor of the creation of such district, the board of supervisors shall adopt a resolution creating the district as described in the resolution of intention.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-21; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1973).

§ 19-5-161.
Costs.

All costs incident to the publication of the notices and all other costs incident to the public hearing and election provided in Sections 19-5-153 through 19-5-157 may be paid by the board of supervisors, in its discretion, or shall be borne by the parties filing the petition, detailed in Section 19-5-153. The board of supervisors, in its discretion, may require the execution of a cost bond by the parties filing the petition. Such bond shall be in an amount and with good sureties to guarantee the payment of such costs.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-21; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1973).

§ 19-5-163.
Appeals.

Any party having an interest in the subject matter and aggrieved or prejudiced by the findings and adjudication of the board of supervisors may appeal to the circuit court of the county in the manner provided by law for appeals from orders of the board of supervisors. However, if no such appeal be taken within a period of fifteen (15) days from and after the date of the adoption of the resolution creating any such district, the creation of such district shall be final and conclusive and shall not thereafter be subject to attack in any court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-21; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1973).

§ 19-5-164.
Creation of district embracing lands in more than one county.

A district embracing lands in more than one county may be created under the provision of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 by the following procedure if the portion of such district located in each county includes twenty percent (20%) or more of all of the lands to be embraced in a district:

The portion of a proposed district containing the largest area of land shall be first created into a district by the board of supervisors of the county in which such largest portion is situated, such county to be known as the “incorporating county.”

The resolution first creating such district shall include the exact boundaries of the lands situated in the incorporating county and shall include the exact boundaries of the contiguous area in other counties to be included in the district.

The resolution by the incorporating county shall designate the official name of the district and shall delineate the procedure by which appointment of the five (5) commissioners authorized by Section 19-5-167, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall be apportioned among the counties in which portions of such districts are located.

The resolution adopted by the board of supervisors of any county desiring to include contiguous lands into a district initially created as outlined above shall contain exact and identical provisions to those in the resolution by the board of supervisors of the incorporating county.

The board of supervisors of the incorporating county shall, within sixty (60) days after the adoption of a resolution or resolutions by the board of supervisors of adjoining counties to enter lands into the district, enter an order on its minutes acknowledging, affirming and adjudicating the incorporation of the district.

Any contiguous lands in an adjoining county, but not amounting to twenty percent (20%) or more of the total land area included in a district, may be served by a district created under the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 if a certificate of convenience and necessity to do so is issued by the Mississippi Public Service Commission. Provided, however, the provisions of Sections 19-5-189 and 19-5-191, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall not be applicable to any lands not a part of a district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 493, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 1973).

§ 19-5-165.
District as public corporation; transfer of assets and liabilities of rural water association to newly created water district.

Beginning on the date of the adoption of the resolution creating any district, the district shall be a public corporation in perpetuity under its corporate name and shall, in that name, be a body politic and corporate with power of perpetual succession.

If the creation of the district is initiated in accordance with Section 19-5-153(3), all assets and liabilities of the nonprofit, nonshare corporation shall become the assets and liabilities of the newly organized district without any further meetings, voting, notice to creditors or actions by members of the board beginning on the date of adoption of the resolution of the board of supervisors creating the district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-22; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 304, § 3, eff from and after August 2, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section).

§ 19-5-167.
Board of commissioners; appointment; terms; general powers and duties.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the powers of each district shall be vested in and exercised by a board of commissioners consisting of five (5) members to be appointed by the board of supervisors. Upon their initial appointment, one (1) of the commissioners shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year; one (1) for a term of two (2) years; one (1) for a term of three (3) years; one (1) for a term of four (4) years; and one (1) for a term of five (5) years; thereafter, each commissioner shall be appointed and shall hold office for a term of five (5) years. Any vacancy occurring on a board of commissioners shall be filled by the board of supervisors at any regular meeting of the board of supervisors, and the board of supervisors shall have the authority to fill all unexpired terms of any commissioner or commissioners. Notwithstanding the appointive authority herein granted to the board of supervisors, its legal and actual responsibilities, authority and function, subsequent to the creation of any district, shall be specifically limited to the appointive function and responsibilities outlined in Sections 19-5-179, 19-5-189 and 19-5-191, except that with fire protection districts, the board of supervisors shall have authority for dissolving, redefining and reconfiguring of such districts as may be appropriate to ensure the most appropriate and efficient fire protection coverage for the county’s citizens. The operation, management, abolition or dissolution of such district, and all other matters in connection therewith, shall be vested solely and only in the board of commissioners to the specific exclusion of the board of supervisors, and the abolition, dissolution or termination of any district shall be accomplished only by unanimous resolution of the board of commissioners, except that with fire protection districts, the board of supervisors shall have authority for the dissolving, redefining and reconfiguring of such districts when determined appropriate. However, if any area within the boundaries of a fire protection district created under Section 19-5-151 et seq., is annexed by a municipality, a reduction of the boundaries of the district to exclude such annexed area may be accomplished by the adoption of a resolution by a majority vote of the board of commissioners of that fire protection district. The county board of supervisors which has a fire protection district created under Section 19-5-151 et seq., may dissolve, redefine and reconfigure such district and, under Section 19-5-215 et seq., may create a fire protection grading district consisting of the same boundaries as the previously existing fire protection district or having amended boundaries as determined appropriate by the board of supervisors. Petition and election requirements of Sections 19-5-217 through 19-5-227 shall not apply where the board of supervisors dissolves a fire protection district and creates a fire protection grading district under this section. Except as otherwise provided herein, such board of supervisors or commissioners shall have no power, jurisdiction or authority to abolish, dissolve or terminate any district while the district has any outstanding indebtedness of any kind or character, unless arrangements are made for the assumption of any outstanding indebtedness by the subsequent district or by the county. If a fire protection district is dissolved in accordance with this subsection, the board of supervisors may continue to levy the same millage as was being levied within the boundaries of the previous fire protection district before its dissolution provided that a fire protection grading district is created, in accordance with Section 19-5-215 et seq.

The board of supervisors of the incorporating county may consolidate such fire protection districts for administrative purposes. The board of supervisors shall conduct a public hearing to determine the public’s interest. Following such a hearing, the board may create a consolidated commission consisting of the participating districts for administrative purposes. Such districts then shall dissolve their respective boards of commissioners, transferring all records to the consolidated board of commissioners. A consolidated board of commissioners consisting of not less than five (5) members shall be appointed with equal representation from each participating district. Any commissioners appointed to a consolidated fire protection district commission must comply with eligibility requirements as authorized in Section 19-5-171. In the event that a consolidated fire protection district commission consists of an even number of members, the chairman elected as authorized by Section 19-5-169 shall vote only in the event of a tie. General powers and duties of commissioners and commissions and other related matters as defined in Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall apply to the entire area contained in the consolidating fire protection districts as described in the resolutions incorporating the fire protection districts as well as to subsequent annexations.

If the creation of the district is initiated in accordance with Section 19-5-153(3), the powers of the district shall be vested in and exercised by a board of commissioners selected in the following manner:

Upon creation of the district, the board of directors of the former nonprofit, nonshare corporation shall serve as the board of commissioners of the newly created water district for a period not to exceed sixty (60) days. The initial commissioners shall be subject to the requirements of Section 19-5-171, except the requirement for executing a bond. If an initial commissioner fails to meet a requirement of Section 19-5-171 as provided in this section, the board of supervisors shall appoint a member to fill that vacancy on the board of commissioners.

In the resolution creating a district initiated in accordance with Section 19-5-153(3), the board of supervisors shall direct the existing board of directors of the rural water association to create within the district five (5) posts from which commissioners shall be elected. The board of supervisors shall designate the positions to be elected from each post as Post 1, Post 2, Post 3, Post 4 and Post 5. Post 5 shall be an at-large post composed of the entire district. Within sixty (60) days following creation of the district, the board of supervisors shall call an election. Such election shall be held and conducted by the election commissioners in accordance with the general laws governing elections. The election commissioners shall determine which of the qualified electors of the county reside within the district and only those electors shall be entitled to vote in the election. Notice of the election setting forth the time, place or places and the purpose of the election shall be published by the clerk of the board of supervisors in the manner provided in Section 19-5-155.

The initial elected commissioners shall be elected to a term of office expiring on December 31 of the year in which the next succeeding general election for statewide officials is held. After the initial term of office, commissioners shall be elected to four-year terms. Vacancies shall be filled by the procedure set forth in Section 23-15-839.

For any water and sewer district located within the corporate limits of a municipality that was incorporated on or after January 2012, the powers of the district shall be vested in and exercised by a board of commissioners consisting of five (5) members, each to be appointed by the governing authority of such municipality, one (1) member to be appointed from each municipal ward in the city. Each commissioner shall be appointed and shall hold office for a term of five (5) years. Any vacancy occurring on the board of commissioners shall be filled by the governing authority of the municipality at any regular meeting. Appointments to fill vacancies in unexpired terms of office shall be for the remaining unexpired term of office for such position.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-22; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 15; Laws, 1999, ch. 304, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 452, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 303, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 342, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 19-5-169.
Board of commissioners; officers; seal.

The board of commissioners shall organize by electing one of its members as chairman and another as vice-chairman. It shall be the duty of the chairman to preside at all meetings of the board and to act as the chief executive officer of the board and of the district. The vice-chairman shall act in the absence or disability of the chairman. The board also shall elect and fix the compensation of a secretary-treasurer who may or may not be a member of the board. It shall be the duty of the secretary-treasurer to keep all minutes and records of the board and to safely keep all funds of the district. The secretary-treasurer shall be required to execute a bond, payable to the district, in a sum and with such security as shall be fixed and approved by the board of commissioners. The terms of all officers of the board shall be for one year from and after the date of election, and shall run until their respective successors are appointed or elected and qualified.

Each board of commissioners shall adopt an official seal with which to attest the official acts and records of the board and district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-23; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 3; Laws, 1999, ch. 304, § 5, eff from and after August 2, 1999 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the amendment of this section.).

§ 19-5-171.
Board of commissioners; eligibility; bond; oath; compensation.

Every resident citizen of the county in which is located any district created under Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207, of good reputation, being the owner of land or the conductor of a business situated within the district and being over twenty-five (25) years of age and of sound mind and judgment, shall be eligible to hold the office of commissioner.

Except as provided in Section 19-5-164(3), each person appointed or elected as a commissioner, before entering upon the discharge of the duties of the person’s office, shall be required to execute a bond payable to the State of Mississippi in the penal sum of not less than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) conditioned that the person will faithfully discharge the duties of the office. Each bond shall be approved by the clerk of the board of supervisors and filed with the clerk.

Each commissioner shall take and subscribe to an oath of office prescribed in Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, before the clerk of the board of supervisors that the person will faithfully discharge the duties of the office of commissioner, which oath shall also be filed with the clerk and preserved with the official bond.

Except as provided in subsection (5), the commissioners so appointed or elected and qualified shall be compensated for their services for each meeting of the board of commissioners attended, either regular or special, at a rate to be fixed by the board of supervisors, not to exceed the rate established in Section 25-3-69 for officers of state boards, commissions and agencies, and shall be reimbursed for all expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their official duties in accordance with Section 25-3-41. However, in no one (1) calendar year shall any commissioner be compensated for more than twenty-four (24) meetings.

The commissioners of the Hancock County Water and Sewer District shall be compensated for their services at a rate up to Eighty-four Dollars ($84.00) per day for each meeting of the board of commissioners attended, either regular or special, and shall be reimbursed for all expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their official duties in accordance with Section 25-3-41.

The commissioners of the Kiln Utility and Fire District of Hancock County shall be compensated for their services at a rate up to Eighty-four Dollars ($84.00) per day for each meeting of the board of commissioners attended, either regular or special, and shall be reimbursed for all expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their official duties in accordance with Section 25-3-41.

The commissioners of the Pearlington Water and Sewer District of Hancock County shall be compensated for their services at a rate up to Eighty-four Dollars ($84.00) per day for each meeting of the board of commissioners attended, either regular or special, and shall be reimbursed for all expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their official duties in accordance with Section 25-3-41.

The commissioners of the Diamondhead Water and Sewer District of Hancock County shall be compensated for their services at a rate up to the Eighty-four Dollars ($84.00) per day for each meeting of the board of commissioners attended, either regular or special, and shall be reimbursed for all expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their official duties in accordance with Section 25-3-41.

The commissioners of the Hancock County Solid Waste Authority shall be compensated for their services at a rate up to the Eighty-four Dollars ($84.00) per day for each meeting of the board of commissioners attended, either regular or special, and shall be reimbursed for all expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their official duties in accordance with Section 25-3-41.

The commissioners of the Standard Dedeaux Water District shall be compensated for their services at a rate up to the Eighty-four Dollars ($84.00) per day for each meeting of the board of commissioners attended, either regular or special, and shall be reimbursed for all expenses necessarily incurred in the discharge of their official duties in accordance with Section 25-3-41.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-24; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 4; Laws, 1999, ch. 304, § 6; Laws, 2002, ch. 580, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 454, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 453, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 467, § 4; Laws, 2011, ch. 902, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 30, 2011.).

§ 19-5-173.
Board of commissioners; power to enact regulations.

The board of commissioners shall have the power to make regulations to secure the general health of those residing in the district; to prevent, remove and abate nuisances; to regulate or prohibit the construction of privy-vaults and cesspools, and to regulate or suppress those already constructed; and to compel and regulate the connection of all property with sewers.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-25; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 5; Laws, 1973, ch. 370, § 1; ch. 396, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 28, 1973).

§ 19-5-175.
General powers of districts.

Districts created under the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall have the powers enumerated in the resolution of the board of supervisors creating such districts but shall be limited to the conducting and operating of a water supply system, a sewer system, a garbage and waste collection and disposal system, a fire protection system, a combined water and fire protection system, a combined water and sewer system, a combined water and garbage and waste collection and disposal system, or a combined water, sewer, garbage and waste collection and disposal and fire protection system; and to carry out such purpose or purposes, such districts shall have the power and authority to acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve, better, extend, consolidate, maintain and operate such system or systems, and to contract with any municipality, person, firm or corporation for such services and for a supply and distribution of water, for collection, transportation, treatment and/or disposal of sewage and for services required incident to the operation and maintenance of such systems. As long as any such district continues to furnish any of the services which it was authorized to furnish in and by the resolution by which it was created, it shall be the sole public corporation empowered to furnish such services within such district. However, if the board of commissioners of such district and the board of supervisors unanimously agree, the county may contract directly with any fire protection services provider, in which case the board of supervisors may distribute directly to the fire protection services provider any or all of the funds that otherwise would be distributed to the fire protection district.

Any district created pursuant to the provisions of Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 shall be vested with all the powers necessary and requisite for the accomplishment of the purpose for which such district is created. No enumeration of powers herein shall be construed to impair or limit any general grant of power herein contained nor to limit any such grant to a power or powers of the same class or classes as those enumerated. Such districts are empowered to do all acts necessary, proper or convenient in the exercise of the powers granted under such sections.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 2998.7-25, 2998.7-26; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, §§ 5, 6; Laws, 1973, ch. 370, § 1; Laws, 1973 ch. 396, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 387, § 16, eff from and after July 27, 1992 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to this amendment).

§ 19-5-177.
Additional powers of districts.

Any district created under Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207, acting by and through the board of commissioners of such district as its governing authority, shall have the following, among other, powers:

To sue and be sued;

To acquire by purchase, gift, devise and lease or any other mode of acquisition, other than by eminent domain, hold and dispose of real and personal property of every kind within or without the district;

To make and enter into contracts, conveyances, mortgages, deeds of trust, bonds, leases or contracts for financial advisory services;

To incur debts, to borrow money, to issue negotiable bonds, and to provide for the rights of the holders thereof;

To fix, maintain, collect and revise rates and charges for services rendered by or through the facilities of such district, which rates and charges shall not be subject to review or regulation by the Mississippi Public Service Commission except in those instances where a city operating similar services would be subject to regulation and review; however, the district may furnish services, including connection to the facilities of the district, free of charge to the county or any agency or department of the county and to volunteer fire departments located within the service area of the district. The district shall obtain a certificate of convenience and necessity from the Mississippi Public Service Commission for operating of water and/or sewer systems;

To pledge all or any part of its revenues to the payment of its obligations;

To make such covenants in connection with the issuance of bonds or to secure the payment of bonds that a private business corporation can make under the general laws of the state;

To use any right-of-way, public right-of-way, easement, or other similar property or property rights necessary or convenient in connection with the acquisition, improvement, operation or maintenance of the facilities of such district held by the state or any political subdivision thereof; however, the governing body of such political subdivision shall consent to such use;

To enter into agreements with state and federal agencies for loans, grants, grants-in-aid, and other forms of assistance including, but not limited to, participation in the sale and purchase of bonds;

To acquire by purchase any existing works and facilities providing services for which it was created, and any lands, rights, easements, franchises and other property, real and personal necessary to the completion and operation of such system upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon, and if necessary as part of the purchase price to assume the payment of outstanding notes, bonds or other obligations upon such system;

To extend its services to areas beyond but within one (1) mile of the boundaries of such district; however, no such extension shall be made to areas already occupied by another corporate agency rendering the same service so long as such corporate agency desires to continue to serve such areas. Areas outside of the district desiring to be served which are beyond the one (1) mile limit must be brought into the district by annexation proceedings;

To be deemed to have the same status as counties and municipalities with respect to payment of sales taxes on purchases made by such districts;

To borrow funds for interim financing subject to receipt of funds as outlined in Section 19-5-181;

To provide group life insurance coverage for all or specified groups of employees of the district and group hospitalization benefits for those employees and their dependents, and to pay the total cost of these benefits. For purposes of this paragraph, the term “employees” does not include any person who is a commissioner of a district created under Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207, and such commissioners are not eligible to receive any insurance coverage or benefits made available to district employees under this paragraph.

Any district which is incorporated under Sections 19-5-151 through 19-5-207 to provide sewer services may install or provide for the installation of sewage holding tanks at residential properties within the district, if funding for municipal or community sewers has been awarded to the district. The district shall maintain or provide for the maintenance of the sewage holding tank systems. The district may assess and collect from each resident using a sewage holding tank a fee covering the costs of providing the services authorized under this section. When municipal or community sewers are available and ready for use, residences with sewage holding tanks shall be connected to the sewer system.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-27; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 7; Laws, 1999, ch. 361, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 565, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 580, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 11, 2002.).

§ 19-5-179.
Eminent domain.

The board of supervisors of such county may, upon petition by the board of commissioners of the district, exercise the power of eminent domain on behalf of the district wherever and whenever public necessity and convenience so requires.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2998.7-28; Laws, 1972, ch. 536, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 23, 1972).